Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6838
Rules and regulations.

Except as otherwise stated in the ImagiNE Nebraska Act, the director, with input from the Tax Commissioner, may adopt and promulgate all procedures and rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of the ImagiNE Nebraska Act.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 38.